Utah statutes.
54-8-10.   Public hearing -- Notice -- Publication.

(1)  Such notice shall be:

(a) (i)  published:

(A)  in full one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the district; or

(B)  if there be no such newspaper, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or town in which the district is located; and

(ii)  published on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701; and

(b)  posted in not less than three public places in the district.

(2)  A copy of the notice shall be mailed by certified mail to the last known address of each owner of land within the proposed district whose property will be assessed for the cost of the improvement.

(3)  The address to be used for that purpose shall be that last appearing on the real property assessment rolls of the county in which the property is located.

(4)  In addition, a copy of the notice shall be addressed to "Owner" and shall be so mailed addressed to the street number of each piece of improved property to be affected by the assessment.

(5)  Mailed notices and the published notice shall state where a copy of the resolution creating the district will be available for inspection by any interested parties.

